Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-1229
Electronic records; authorized.

All books, papers, documents, reports, and records kept by a school district or educational service unit may be retained as electronic records. Minutes of the meetings of the board of a school district or educational service unit may be kept as an electronic record.

Laws 2015, LB365, § 1.